test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xaraxa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - хараха: #

    хараха+V+FutPrc: хараха

    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: харанаб
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: харанаш
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: харана
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: харанабди
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: харанат
    хараха+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: харана

    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Sg1: харабаб
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Sg2: харабаш
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Sg3: хараба
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Pl1: харабабди
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Pl2: харабат
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Pl3: хараба

    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Sg1: харалайб
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Sg2: харалайш
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Sg3: харалай
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Pl1: харалайбди
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Pl2: харалайт
    хараха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Pl3: харалай
    
    хараха+V+Imp+Sg2: хара
    хараха+V+Imp+Pl2: харагты
    хараха+V+Opt+Sg1: хараһууб
    хараха+V+Opt+Pl1: хараһуубди
    хараха+V+Vol+Sg1: хараяа
    хараха+V+Vol+Pl1: [хараябди, харая]

    хараха+V+FutPrc+Sg1: харахаб
    хараха+V+FutPrc+Sg2: харахаш
    хараха+V+FutPrc+Sg3: хараха
    хараха+V+FutPrc+Pl1: харахабди
    хараха+V+FutPrc+Pl2: харахат
    хараха+V+FutPrc+Pl3: хараха

    хараха+V+ImpfPrc+Sg1: харааб
    хараха+V+ImpfPrc+Sg2: харааш
    хараха+V+ImpfPrc+Sg3: хараа
    хараха+V+ImpfPrc+Pl1: хараабди
    хараха+V+ImpfPrc+Pl2: хараат
    хараха+V+ImpfPrc+Pl3: хараа

    хараха+V+HabPrc+Sg1: харадагби
    хараха+V+HabPrc+Sg2: харадагши
    хараха+V+HabPrc+Sg3: харадаг
    хараха+V+HabPrc+Pl1: харадагбди
    хараха+V+HabPrc+Pl2: харадагта
    хараха+V+HabPrc+Pl3: харадаг

    хараха+V+AgPrc+Sg1: харагшаб
    хараха+V+AgPrc+Sg2: харагшаш
    хараха+V+AgPrc+Sg3: харагша
    хараха+V+AgPrc+Pl1: харагшабди
    хараха+V+AgPrc+Pl2: харагшат
    хараха+V+AgPrc+Pl3: харагша

    хараха+V+AgConstPrc+Sg1: хараашаб
    хараха+V+AgConstPrc+Sg2: хараашаш
    хараха+V+AgConstPrc+Sg3: харааша
    хараха+V+AgConstPrc+Pl1: хараашабди
    хараха+V+AgConstPrc+Pl2: хараашат
    хараха+V+AgConstPrc+Pl3: харааша

    хараха+V+PerfPrc+Sg1: хараһанби
    хараха+V+PerfPrc+Sg2: хараһанши
    хараха+V+PerfPrc+Sg3: хараһан
    хараха+V+PerfPrc+Pl1: [хараһамди, хараһанбди]
    хараха+V+PerfPrc+Pl2: хараһанта
    хараха+V+PerfPrc+Pl3: хараһан

    хараха+V+PotPrc+Sg1: харахаарби
    хараха+V+PotPrc+Sg2: харахаарши
    хараха+V+PotPrc+Sg3: харахаар
    хараха+V+PotPrc+Pl1: харахаарбди
    хараха+V+PotPrc+Pl2: харахаарта
    хараха+V+PotPrc+Pl3: харахаар

    хараха+V+DualPrc+Sg1: харамаарби
    хараха+V+DualPrc+Sg2: харамаарши
    хараха+V+DualPrc+Sg3: харамаар
    хараха+V+DualPrc+Pl1: харамаарбди
    хараха+V+DualPrc+Pl2: харамаарта
    хараха+V+DualPrc+Pl3: харамаар

    хараха+V+PassPrc+Sg1: хараатайб
    хараха+V+PassPrc+Sg2: хараатайш
    хараха+V+PassPrc+Sg3: хараатай
    хараха+V+PassPrc+Pl1: хараатайбди
    хараха+V+PassPrc+Pl2: хараатайт
    хараха+V+PassPrc+Pl3: хараатай

    хараха+V+ResPrc+Sg1: харанхайб
    хараха+V+ResPrc+Sg2: харанхайш
    хараха+V+ResPrc+Sg3: харанхай
    хараха+V+ResPrc+Pl1: харанхайбди
    хараха+V+ResPrc+Pl2: харанхайт
    хараха+V+ResPrc+Pl3: харанхай

    хараха+V+ConMod: харан
    хараха+V+ConImpf: хаража
    хараха+V+ConPrf: хараад
    хараха+V+ConCond: харабал
    хараха+V+ConConc: харабашье
    хараха+V+ConTerm: харатар
    хараха+V+ConCntmp: харамсаар
    хараха+V+ConAbtmp: хараһаар
    хараха+V+ConFin: харахаар
    хараха+V+ConIntnt: харахаяа
    хараха+V+ConSucc: харахалаар
    хараха+V+ConCmp: харанхаар
